Idaho, session 2025, H0129.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 58-133, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
58-133. ACQUISITION, SALE, LEASE, EXCHANGE OR DONATION OF PUBLIC
LANDS -- CREATION AND OPERATION OF LAND BANK FUND. (1) The state board of land
commissioners may select and purchase, lease, receive by donation, hold in
trust, or in any manner acquire for and in the name of the state of Idaho such
tracts or leaseholds of land as it shall deem proper, and after inventory
and classification as provided herein, shall determine the best use or uses
of said lands: provided, however, that all state-owned lands classified
as chiefly valuable for forestry, reforestation, recreation and watershed
protection are hereby reserved from sale and set aside as state forests.
(2) The proceeds from the sale of state endowment land may be deposited
into a fund which shall be known as the "land bank fund," which is hereby cre-
ated in the state treasury for the purpose of temporarily holding proceeds
from land sales pending the purchase of other land for the benefit of the
beneficiaries of the endowment. A record shall be maintained showing sep-
arately from each of the respective endowments the moneys received from the
sale of endowment lands. Moneys from the sale of lands which are a part of an
endowment land grant shall be used only to purchase land for the same endow-
ment.
(3) All moneys deposited in the land bank fund, including earnings
on those moneys, are hereby continually appropriated to the state board of
land commissioners for the purposes enumerated in this section. The state
board of land commissioners may hold proceeds from the sale of land in the
land bank fund for a period not to exceed five (5) ten (10) years from the
effective date of sale. If, by the end of the fifth tenth year, the proceeds
from the land sale have not been encumbered to purchase other land within the
state, the proceeds shall be deposited in the permanent endowment fund of the
respective endowment along with any earnings on the proceeds from the land
sale, unless the period is extended by the legislature.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.